Georgia, session 2025_26, HB608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Muscogee County School District, approved February 25, 1949
(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1086), as amended, is amended by revising subsection (g) of Section 5 as
follows:
"(g)(1) A vacancy on the board of education occurring for any reason shall be filled as
follows:
(A) If the vacancy occurs more than 90 days before to the date of a general election
preceding the general election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term
of office, then such vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term of office at a special
election to be held on the same date as said general election preceding the general
election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term of office; and in this
H. B. 608
- 1 -

LC 62 0078/AP
case the remaining members of the board of education shall, by majority vote, select a
qualified person to fill the vacancy until the person elected at such special election takes
office; and
(B) If the vacancy occurs 90 days or fewer before the date of a general election
preceding the general election at which a successor will be elected to a new full term
of office, then the remaining members of the local board of education shall, by majority
vote, select a qualified person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(2) Any person elected or appointed to fill a vacancy pursuant to this subsection shall
possess the same qualifications required for election to a full term of office as provided
by law applicable to the office wherein the vacancy occurred. As applied to special
elections, if the office wherein the vacancy occurred is filled by election of voters within
a portion of the local school district, then the special election shall be held within that
portion of the local school district; provided, however, that, if the office wherein the
vacancy occurred is filled by the voters within the entire school district, then the special
election shall be held within the entire school district.
(3) The election superintendent of Muscogee County shall issue the call for a special
election to fill a vacancy as required by this subsection. The call for a special election
shall be issued within 30 days after the existence of a vacancy has been established. A
special election to fill vacancies shall be held and conducted in accordance with the
applicable provisions of Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., known as the 'Georgia
Election Code.'"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 608
- 2 -